Utah statutes.
30-3-13.1.   Establishment of family court division of district court.

A family court division of the district court may be established with the consent of the county legislative body in a county in which the district court determines that the social conditions in the county and the number of domestic relations cases in the courts require use of the procedures provided for in this act in order to give full and proper consideration to such cases and to effectuate the purposes of this act. The determination shall be made annually by the judge of the district court in counties having only one judge, and by a majority of the judges of the district court in counties having more than one judge.



Amended by Chapter 227, 1993 General Session

